Washington statutes.
RCW 10.64.015

Judgment to include costs—Exception.

When the defendant is found guilty, the court shall render judgment accordingly, and the defendant may be liable for all costs, unless the court or jury trying the cause expressly find otherwise. The court shall not order a defendant to pay costs, as described in RCW 10.01.160, if the court finds that the person at the time of sentencing is indigent as defined in RCW 10.01.160(3).

[ 2022 c 260 s 11; 2018 c 269 s 10; Code 1881 s 1104; 1873 p 241 s 272; 1854 p 121 s 129; RRS s 2187. Formerly RCW 10.64.010, part.]

NOTES:

Construction—Effective date—2022 c 260: See notes following RCW 3.66.120.

Construction—2018 c 269: See note following RCW 10.82.090.

Requiring defendant to pay costs—Procedure: RCW 10.01.160, 10.01.170, chapter 10.82 RCW.